Utah statutes.
53B-1-102.   State system of higher education.

(1)  The state system of higher education consists of the following institutions:

(a)  State Board of Regents;

(b)  the University of Utah;

(c)  Utah State University;

(d)  Weber State University;

(e)  Southern Utah University;

(f)  Snow College;

(g)  Dixie State University;

(h)  Utah Valley University;

(i)  Salt Lake Community College;

(j)  the Utah College of Applied Technology; and

(k)  other public post-high school educational institutions as the Legislature may designate.

(2)  A change in the name of an institution within the system of higher education shall not be considered a change in the role or mission of the institution, unless otherwise authorized by the State Board of Regents.

(3)  It is not the intent of the Legislature to increase the number of research universities in the state beyond the University of Utah and Utah State University.

(4)  These institutions are empowered to sue and be sued and to contract and be contracted with.



Amended by Chapter 10, 2013 General Session

